Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1269.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Commercial and Nonresidential Products and Property Protection Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Electrified security system." An outdoor alarm system that is an assembly of battery-charged equipment and all of its integrated components and equipment, including a monitored alarm device intended to notify the entity monitoring the alarm system of possible intrusion to the property, an energizer which is intended to periodically deliver pulses to a security system, a battery-charging device used exclusively to charge the system 12345678910111213141516171819 battery and any other integrated components. The term does not include a fence system used primarily for the containment of livestock or other animals."Municipality." A county, city, township, borough, incorporated town, home rule municipality or other general purpose unit of government established by an act of the General Assembly.Section 3. Electrified security system requirements.(a) Installation.--An entity authorized to conduct business in this Commonwealth under 15 Pa.C.S. (relating to corporations and unincorporated associations) and sole proprietorships may install an electrified security system in accordance with this act.(b) Requirements for compliance.--An electrified security system installation shall:(1) Have an energizer that is driven by a commercial storage battery not to exceed 12 volts direct current.(2) Interface with a monitored alarm device that transmits a signal to the installer or a person that is monitoring or otherwise instructed to notify a public safety agency of the alarm. The system may not directly connect to or call law enforcement.(3) Be located four inches to eight inches behind a nonelectrified perimeter barrier and have a total height of either two feet higher than the nonelectrified perimeter barrier or 10 feet, whichever is greater.(4) Be located on property that is not designated by a municipality exclusively for residential use.(5) Be clearly identified with warning signs containing the international warning symbol for electric shock at 20260SB1269PN1582 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intervals of not greater than 30 linear feet.(c) Installer requirements.--The installer of an electrified security system shall provide notice to the municipality that the electrified security system has been installed pursuant to subsection (b). The notice shall contain the alarm company installation name, the business entity name and address where the electrified security system was installed.(d) Local regulation.--A municipality may:(1) Require registration of an alarm system for the electrified security system.(2) Prohibit an electrified security system that does not meet the requirements of this section.Section 4. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to apply to security alarm systems that do not attach to a security system capable of delivering an electric pulse.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1269PN1582 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718